Utah statutes.
31A-36-105.   Filing and use of forms for life settlement and disclosure.
(1) A person may not use a form unless the form is filed with the commissioner
under Subsection 31A-21-201(1).
(2)  The commissioner may prohibit the use of a form submitted under
Subsection (1) pursuant to Subsection 31A-21-201(3).
(3)  The commissioner may require the submission of advertising material
before its use.
